Alaska statutes. Title 10. Corporations and Associations.
Article 7. Biennial Reports and Notices.

Sec. 10.20.620.
Biennial report of domestic and foreign corporations.

Each domestic corporation and each foreign corporation authorized to transact business in the state shall file a biennial report within the time prescribed by this chapter. The information contained in the biennial report shall be given as of June 30 of the reporting year.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968; am § 60 ch 123 SLA 1980)

Collateral references. —

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations, § 272 et seq.

19 C.J.S., Corporations, §§ 638, 639.

Sec. 10.20.625.
Contents of biennial report.

The biennial report must set out

the name of the corporation and the state or country where it is incorporated;

the address of the registered office of the corporation in the state, and the name of its registered agent in the state at that address, and, in the case of a foreign corporation, the address of its principal office in the state or country where it is incorporated;

a brief statement of the character of the business in which the corporation is engaged in the state;

the names and addresses of the directors and officers of the corporation;

the real and personal property assets of the corporation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968; am § 9 ch 145 SLA 1975; am § 47 ch 170 SLA 1976; am § 61 ch 123 SLA 1980)

Sec. 10.20.630.
Filing of biennial report of domestic and foreign corporations.

The biennial report of a domestic or foreign corporation must be delivered to the commissioner before July 2 of the reporting year. A domestic corporation filing its articles of incorporation and a foreign corporation receiving a certificate of authority during an even-numbered year must file the biennial report before July 2 of each even-numbered year. A corporation filing its articles of incorporation or receiving its certificate of authority during an odd-numbered year must file the biennial report before July 2 of each odd-numbered year. The biennial report is delinquent if not filed before August 1 of each odd or even year as provided in this section. Delinquent returns are subject to the penalty prescribed in AS

10.20.325

.

[Repealed, § 48 ch 170 SLA 1976.]

Proof to the satisfaction of the commissioner that before August 1 the report was deposited in the United States mail in a sealed envelope, properly addressed, with postage prepaid, is compliance with (a) of this section.

Upon finding that the report conforms to the requirements of this chapter, the commissioner shall file it. Upon finding that it does not conform to the requirements of this chapter, the commissioner shall return it promptly to the corporation for necessary corrections. If the report is corrected to conform to the requirements of this chapter and returned to the commissioner in sufficient time to be filed before October 1 of the year in which it is due, the penalties for failure to file the report provided in AS

10.20.645

do not apply.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968; am § 48 ch 170 SLA 1976; am § 62 ch 123 SLA 1980)

Sec. 10.20.631.
Filing notice of change of officers or directors.

In the event of a change of an officer or director during the year following the filing of the biennial report, the corporation must file a notice of change amending the report before July 2 of that year.

The notice must be filed in the office of the commissioner and must state the name and current address of a director or officer not stated in the corporation’s last filed biennial report, and the name of the person replaced and the office held. The notice must be signed by an officer of the corporation.

History.

(§ 63 ch 123 SLA 1980)